District of Columbia statutes.
42-504

Freeholds; chattels real; chattel interests; conditions precedent or subsequent.

Estates of inheritance and estates for life shall continue to be denominated freeholds, and estates for years shall be chattels real; estates at will or by sufferance shall be chattel interests, but shall not be liable, as such, to sale under execution; and all estates may be subject to conditions precedent or subsequent.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1351, ch. 854, § 1014

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-204.
1973 Ed., § 45-804.